Rhode Island, session 2025, SB618.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-3 of the General Laws entitled "Vital Records" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
23-3-25.2. Incarcerated persons' exemption for fees for copies and searches.
Any incarcerated person who is set to be released from prison to re-enter the community
shall be processed without a charge or fee when making a first request for vital statistics at the
department of health regarding a request for their own personal records.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001366
========